District of Columbia statutes.
6-651.02

Discrimination against foreign government based on race, color, or creed prohibited.

Sections 6-651.01 and 6-651.02 shall not be administered in such a way as to discriminate against any foreign government on the basis of the race, color, or creed of any of its citizens.

Oct. 13, 1964, 78 Stat. 1092, Pub. L. 88-659, § 5
1981 Ed., § 5-422.
1973 Ed., § 5-418d.